New York, session 2025-2026, A10823.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 8351 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 733 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. Supervision of an athletic trainer by a physician shall be contin- 5 uous but shall not be construed as requiring the physical presence of 6 the supervising physician at the time and place where such services are 7 performed, provided however, that such supervision shall include a 8 signed written agreement or protocol created collaboratively between the 9 supervising physician and licensed athletic trainer. The written agree- 10 ment or protocol shall address and describe the nature and scope of 11 athletic training services to be performed by such licensed athletic 12 trainer, in accordance with this title. Such written agreement or proto- 13 col shall be reviewed at least once a year by the supervising physician 14 and athletic trainer and revised if necessary. No physician shall super- 15 vise more than [four] six athletic trainers, except that such limitation 16 shall not apply for athletic trainers practicing in secondary schools, 17 and institutions of postsecondary education, who are practicing under 18 the supervision of a physician who serves as the medical director for 19 such school or institution. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15386-02-6